Maryland, session 2026, SB0984.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0984*

SENATE BILL 984
Article – Correctional Services
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Immigration detention facility” means any building, facility, or structure
used, in whole or in part, to house or detain individuals for federal civil immigration
violations.
1–103.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “DETENTION FACILITY” MEANS ANY BUILDING, FACILITY,
OR STRUCTURE USED, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, TO HOUSE OR DETAIN INDIVIDUALS
FOR CIVIL OR CRIMINAL VIOLATIONS.
(II) “DETENTION FACILITY” INCLUDES AN IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITY.
(3) “UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT” MEANS A COUNTY, A
MUNICIPALITY, OR THE MARYLAND NATIONAL CAPITAL PARK AND PLANNING
COMMISSION.
(A) (B) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE
STATE OR A UNIT OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT APPROVE THE USE
CONSTRUCTION OR OPERATION OF A BUILDING OR, A STRUCTURE, OR OTHER REAL
PROPERTY AS AN IMMIGRATION FOR A DETENTION FACILITY BY A PRIVATE ENTITY
UNLESS IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY IS EXPRESSLY INCLUDED IN THE
APPLICABLE ZONING AUTHORITY.
(2) A GENERAL ZONING CLASSIFICATION AUTHORIZING
GOVERNMENT, PUBLIC, OR INSTITUTIONAL USES DOES NOT CONSTITUTE EXPRESS
AUTHORIZATION FOR A BUILDING OR STRUCTURE TO BE USED AS AN IMMIGRATION
DETENTION FACILITY BY A PRIVATE ENTITY.
(B) (C) A PRIVATE ENTITY MAY NOT OPERATE OR OCCUPY A BUILDING
OR, A STRUCTURE, OR OTHER REAL PROPERTY AS AN IMMIGRATION A DETENTION
FACILITY WITHOUT A USE AND OCCUPANCY AUTHORIZATION OR CHANGE IN USE AND
OCCUPANCY APPROVAL CONSISTENT WITH THIS SECTION.

SENATE BILL 984 3
(C) (D) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, A BUILDING OR, A STRUCTURE,
OR OTHER REAL PROPERTY SHALL BE CONSIDERED PROPOSED FOR USE AS AN
IMMIGRATION A DETENTION FACILITY, REGARDLESS OF HOW THE USE IS DESCRIBED
IN AN APPLICATION OR PERMIT REQUEST, IF:
(1) INDIVIDUALS ARE INTENDED TO BE HELD IN INVOLUNTARY
CUSTODY AND WILL NOT BE FREE TO LEAVE; OR
(2) THE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, OR IMPROVEMENTS INCLUDE
FEATURES CONSISTENT WITH SECURE OR INVOLUNTARY CONFINEMENT,
INCLUDING:
(I) PERIMETER SECURITY MEASURES DESIGNED TO PREVENT
OCCUPANTS FROM LEAVING;
(II) CONTROLLED ACCESS POINTS; OR
(III) LOCKED HOLDING AREAS.
(D) (E) (1) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION TO
ENFORCE THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COURT MAY ISSUE TEMPORARY, PRELIMINARY, OR
PERMANENT INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO PREVENT AN ACT THAT WOULD CONSTITUTE A
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (F) A PRIVATE ENTITY THAT OPERATES OR ATTEMPTS TO OPERATE
AN IMMIGRATION A DETENTION FACILITY IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING $10,000 FOR EACH DAY THE
VIOLATION CONTINUES.
(F) (G) THE REMEDIES PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION ARE IN
ADDITION TO ANY OTHER REMEDY AVAILABLE UNDER STATE OR LOCAL LAW.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be applied
retroactively to any agreement between the State or a unit of local government and a
private entity entered into before the effective date of this Act for the use of any building
or structure, structure, or other real property if that building or structure, structure, or
other real property is intended to be used as an immigration a detention facility, regardless
of any permits issued or investment made by the private entity toward construction or
renovation of the building or, structure, or other real property.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has

SENATE BILL 984
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.